tables/mn-MN.utb
# punctuation  Following opcodes are marked as comment as they are redefined according to mongolian dots
#punctuation \x2013 36-36		# 8211	en dash
#punctuation \x2014 36-36		# em dash
#prepunc ( 126
#postpunc ) 345
#begword ` 6-236
#prepunc " 236
#postpunc " 356
#always \x00AB 236 (opening quotation mark) 
#always \x00BB 356 (closing quotation mark)
#prepunc ' 6-236
#postpunc ' 356-3
#word 'em = 
#word 'tis =
#word 'twas =
#begnum # 1345 print number sign before number
#begnum ° 145-1245 degrees sign
#endnum ° 56-145-1245 ;dg degrees sign
#begnum  \x20AC 15       # euro sign at beginning of number
#endnum  \x20AC 4-15       # euro sign atend  of number
#postpunc , 2
#hyphen - 36
#capsnocont
#postpunc . 256
#postpunc ; 23
#postpunc : 25
#postpunc ! 235
#always / 34
#always < 5-13
#always > 46-2
#postpunc ? 26
#midnum + 0-235-3456
#always + 235
#endnum % 3456-245-356 
#always ^ 4
#always ~ 12456
#always & 12346
#always * 35
#midword \x2019 3	# stupid smart apostrophe
#always [ 45
#always ] 3456
#always { 46
#always } 6
#prepunc ` 6-236
#always @ 146
#always \\ 456-16
#always | 456
#always ... 256-256-256
#always .\s.\s. 256-256-256 . . .
#always $ 256-3456
 midword \x2019 3	# stupid smart apostrophe
# mongolian tables
punctuation \x2013 36-36		# 8211	en dash
punctuation \x2014 36-36		# em dash
prepunc ( 5-126
postpunc ) 5-345
begword ` 6-236
prepunc " 45-236
postpunc " 45-356
always \x00AB 236 (opening quotation mark) 
always \x00BB 356 (closing quotation mark)
prepunc ' 236
postpunc ' 356
word 'em = 
word 'tis =
word 'twas =
begnum # 456-1456 print number sign before number
begnum ° 145-1245 degrees sign
endnum ° 56-145-1245 ;dg degrees sign
begnum  \x20AC 15       # euro sign at beginning of number
endnum  \x20AC 4-15       # euro sign atend  of number
postpunc , 2
hyphen - 36
postpunc . 256
postpunc ; 23
postpunc : 25
postpunc ! 235
always / 34
always < 5-13
always > 46-2
postpunc ? 26
midnum + 0-235-3456
always + 235
endnum % 46-356 
always ^ 4-26
always ~ 4-12346
always * 5-35

always [ 46-126
always ] 46-345
always { 456-126
always } 456-345
prepunc ` 6-236
always @ 4-1
always \\ 456-16
always | 456-1256
always ... 256-256-256
always .\s.\s. 256-256-256 . . .
always $ 256-3456

# special character sequences
sign \x00BD 3456-1-34-12	# 1/2 fraction
sign \x00BC 3456-1-34-145	# 1/4 fraction
sign \x00BE 3456-14-34-145	# 3/4 fraction

#Mongolian additional characters
uplow \x04E8\x04E9 1236
uplow \x04AE\x04AF 1456
